Hawaii statutes.
§514A-17 Contents of deeds or leases of
apartments. Deeds or leases of apartments shall include the following
particulars:

(1) Description of the land as provided in section
514A-11, or incorporation by reference of the description in the declaration, or
the post office address of the property, including in either case an
appropriate reference to the recording of the declaration.

(2) The apartment number of the apartment in the
declaration and any other data necessary for its proper identification.

(3) Statement of the use for which the apartment is
intended and restrictions on its use.

(4) The common interest appertaining to the
apartment.

(5) All encumbrances on the apartment and any further
details which the grantor and grantee, or lessor and lessee, deem desirable to
set forth consistent with the declaration and this chapter. [L 1977, c 98, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next